Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md H.F. 389 DIVISION I 1 STUDENT ABUSE INVOLVING A SCHOOL EMPLOYEE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 2 HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES INVESTIGATIONS 3 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 232E.1 Definitions. 4 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 5 requires: 6 1. âBoard of educational examinersâ means the board created 7 in section 256.146. 8 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 9 services. 10 3. âInvestigationâ means the process by which the department 11 responds to all accepted reports of alleged student abuse. 12 4. âNonpublic schoolâ means the same as defined in section 13 280.2. 14 5. âPublic schoolâ means the same as defined in section 15 280.2. 16 6. âPublic school districtâ means a public school district 17 as described in chapter 274, and includes a charter school 18 under chapter 256E, or a charter school or an innovation zone 19 school under chapter 256F. 20 7. âSchool employeeâ means any of the following: 21 a. A person employed by a public school or a nonpublic 22 school. 23 b. A vendor, or an employee of a vendor, that provides goods 24 or services to a public school or a nonpublic school. 25 c. An agent, or an employee of an agent, of a public school 26 or a nonpublic school. 27 d. A volunteer under the direction and control of any of the 28 following: 29 (1) The board of directors or any administrator of a public 30 school district. 31 (2) The board or authorities in control of a nonpublic 32 school. 33 (3) The board of directors or administrator of an agency 34 called upon by a school official to provide services to 35 -1- HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 1/ 5 H.F. 389 students in an educational capacity. 1 8. âStudentâ means a person enrolled in a public school, 2 a nonpublic school, or a prekindergarten program in a public 3 school or a nonpublic school. 4 9. âStudent abuseâ means any of the following which occur on 5 school grounds during school time, or on or at a school-related 6 curricular or extracurricular activity: 7 a. Any nonaccidental physical injury, or an injury which 8 does not match the history provided for how the injury 9 occurred, suffered by a student as the result of an act or 10 omission of a school employee, that is not otherwise excluded 11 by section 280.21, subsection 2. 12 b. The commission of a sexual offense with or to a child 13 or minor student pursuant to chapter 709, section 726.2, or 14 section 728.12, subsection 1, as a result of an act or omission 15 of a school employee. 16 c. An act or omission of a school employee which allows, 17 permits, or encourages a child or minor student to engage in an 18 act prohibited under section 725.1. 19 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 232E.2 Investigation of alleged 20 student abuse by school employees ââ rules. 21 1. The department shall administer this chapter to provide 22 for the investigation of reports of alleged student abuse by 23 school employees as specified in this chapter. 24 2. a. If, during the child abuse intake process under 25 chapter 232, subchapter 3, part 2, the department receives 26 a report from an identifiable source and the department 27 determines the report constitutes an allegation of student 28 abuse involving a school employee, the department shall notify 29 the board of directors of the public school district or the 30 authorities in charge of the nonpublic school associated with 31 the school employee, and the board of educational examiners, of 32 the determination. 33 b. Upon notification under paragraph âaâ , the board of 34 directors of the public school district or the authorities in 35 -2- HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 2/ 5 H.F. 389 charge of the nonpublic school shall place the school employee 1 on administrative leave and shall prohibit the school employee 2 from entering school property until the investigation is 3 completed. 4 3. If the department determines the alleged student abuse 5 constitutes a criminal act, the department shall do all of the 6 following: 7 a. Immediately refer the matter to, and cooperate in the 8 investigation with, the appropriate law enforcement agency. 9 b. Notify the board of directors of the public school 10 district, or the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school, 11 associated with the school employee of the referral under 12 paragraph âaâ . 13 c. If the school employee is licensed, certified, or 14 authorized by the board of educational examiners, or holds 15 an active statement of recognition issued by the board of 16 educational examiners, notify the board of educational 17 examiners of the referral under paragraph âaâ . 18 4. Following receipt of a report of alleged student abuse, 19 the department shall do all of the following: 20 a. Commence an investigation within twenty-four hours of 21 receipt of the report. 22 b. Complete the investigation within thirty business days of 23 receipt of the report. 24 5. Upon completion of an investigation, the department 25 shall submit a written investigation report to all of the 26 following: 27 a. The board of directors of the public school district, or 28 the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school, associated 29 with the school employee subject to the investigation. 30 b. The board of educational examiners if the school 31 employee subject to the investigation is licensed, certified, 32 or authorized by the board of educational examiners, or holds 33 an active statement of recognition issued by the board of 34 educational examiners. 35 -3- HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 3/ 5 H.F. 389 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 1 17A, in consultation with the department of education, to 2 administer this chapter. Rules adopted by the department shall 3 include rules regarding the intake and investigation processes, 4 investigation reports, case and investigation record retention 5 and dissemination, and case disposition. 6 7. The department shall maintain information and data 7 regarding student abuse reports, investigations, and 8 dispositions under this chapter separately from information 9 and data regarding child abuse reports, assessments, and 10 dispositions under chapter 232. 11 DIVISION II 12 STUDENT ABUSE INVOLVING A SCHOOL EMPLOYEE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 13 EDUCATION 14 Sec. 3. Section 280.17, Code 2025, is amended by striking 15 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 16 280.17 Student abuse investigations ââ termination of 17 employment. 18 1. The board of directors of a public school district and 19 the authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall comply 20 with chapter 232E, and shall cooperate with the department of 21 health and human services during an investigation commenced 22 under chapter 232E. 23 2. The board of directors of a public school or the 24 authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall terminate the 25 employment of a school employee if the board of directors or 26 authorities in charge receive a written investigation report 27 under section 232E.2, subsection 5, indicating the department 28 of health and human services has determined the school employee 29 committed student abuse. 30 3. The department of education, in consultation with the 31 department of health and human services, shall adopt rules 32 pursuant to chapter 17A, and a model policy, for the handling 33 of investigations pursuant to chapter 232E. 34 Sec. 4. Section 321.375, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 35 -4- HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 4/ 5 H.F. 389 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 d. The commission of or conviction for a public offense as 2 defined by the Iowa criminal code, if the offense is relevant 3 to and affects driving ability, or if the offense includes 4 sexual involvement with a minor student with the intent to 5 commit acts and practices proscribed under sections 709.2 6 through 709.4 , section 709.8 , and sections 725.1 through 725.3 , 7 or is a violation of the rules of the department of education 8 adopted to implement section 280.17 student abuse as defined 9 in section 232E.1 . 10 -5- HF 389 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 5/ 5